Utah statutes.
58-70a-504.   Penalty for unlawful conduct.

(1)  Any person who violates the unlawful conduct provision defined in Subsection 58-1-501(1)(a) is guilty of a third degree felony.

(2)  Any person who violates any of the unlawful conduct provisions defined in Subsections 58-1-501(1)(b) through (1)(e) or Section 58-70a-502 is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 229, 1997 General Session

